Washington statutes.
RCW 43.132.055

Fiscal notes—Expenditures by local government—Fiscal responsibility.

When the fiscal note indicates that a bill or resolution would require expenditures of funds by a county, city, town, or other unit of local government, the legislature shall determine the state's fiscal responsibility and shall make every effort to appropriate the funds or provide the revenue generating authority necessary to implement the legislation during the ensuing biennium.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 112 s 2.]